Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Chapter 10. Retired Law Enforcement Identification.

§ 9.1-1000.
Retired and former law-enforcement officers; photo identification cards.

Upon the retirement of a law-enforcement officer, as defined in §

9.1-101

, the employing department or agency shall, upon request of the retiree, issue the individual a photo identification card indicating that such individual is a retired law-enforcement officer of that department or agency. Upon request, such a card shall also be issued to any law-enforcement officer who retired before July 1, 2004.

Upon request of a former law-enforcement officer with at least 10 years of service who has been diagnosed with post-traumatic stress disorder, as defined in §

65.2-107

, by a mental health professional, as defined in §

65.2-107

, or who is disabled, the employing department or agency shall issue the individual a photo identification card indicating that such individual is a former law-enforcement officer of that department or agency who honorably served. However, prior to issuing the photo identification card, the employing department or agency shall have it mounted in such a manner that it will be impossible for anyone to carry it on his person. The employing department or agency may deny, for cause, any request made under this subsection, provided that it gives a written explanation to the requester of the grounds for denial. Any individual issued a photo identification card under this subsection shall be ineligible to receive a photo identification card pursuant to subsection A. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any individual who was decertified pursuant to §

15.2-1707

.

History.

2004, c. 419; 2022, c. 491.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 41, cl. 1 provides: “Any conservation police officer who (i) has at least 20 years of service as a conservation police officer, (ii) was a full-time sworn conservation police officer immediately prior to January 1, 2016, and (iii) was transitioned to a civilian position on January 1, 2016, by the Department of Game and Inland Fisheries shall be considered a retired law-enforcement officer for the purposes of §§

9.1-1000

,

18.2-308

,

18.2-308.03

, and 59.1-148.3.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 491 added the subsection A designation and subsection B.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Issuance of photo identification card. —

A law-enforcement officer who is retired, whether for service or disability, may request a photo identification card from his department or agency indicating that he is a retired law-enforcement officer, and the employing department or agency has no authority to specify the type of retirement for which the photo identification card is issued. See opinion of Attorney General to Robin P. Stanaway, Sheriff of Gloucester County, 05-022, 2005 Va. AG LEXIS 21 (6/24/05).